Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Chapter 30. Operation of Aircraft.

Sec. 02.30.010.
Two-way radios required. [Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 02.30.020.
Unauthorized operation. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For current law, see AS 11.46.484.]

Sec. 02.30.030.
Reckless operation.

A person may not operate an aircraft in the air or on the ground or water in a careless or reckless manner so as to endanger the life or property of another. In a proceeding charging careless or reckless operation of aircraft in violation of this section, the court, in determining whether the operation was careless or reckless, shall consider the standards for safe operation of aircraft prescribed by federal statutes or regulations governing aeronautics.

A person may not operate an aircraft occupied by a crew member or passenger who is obviously under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

[Repealed, § 14 ch 56 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 5 ch 128 SLA 1949; am § 1 ch 117 SLA 1982; am §§ 7, 8, 14 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Collateral references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d, Aviation, § 46 et seq.

2A C.J.S., Aeronautics and Aerospace, § 128 et seq.

Take-off, negligence in operation of aircraft on. 74 ALR2d 615.

Landing, negligence in operation of airplane in. 74 ALR2d 628.

Validity, construction, and application of state criminal statute prohibiting reckless operation of aircraft. 89 ALR3d 893.

Sec. 02.30.040.
Penalties.

A person violating a provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 7 ch 128 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 117 SLA 1982; am § 9 ch 56 SLA 2001)

Sec. 02.30.050.
Definition.

In this chapter, “operate aircraft” means to use, navigate, pilot, or taxi an aircraft in the airspace over this state, or upon the land or water inside this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 128 SLA 1949)